New Mexico, session 2026, HB76.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to contract for services with providers with relevant experience to develop alternative placements to congregate care for youth in state custody that can capably serve and support older youth and youth with higher levels of need, with the purpose of expanding the continuum of care availability, including: acute psychiatric hospital expansions, residential treatment centers, qualified residential treatment programs, adolescent detoxification facilities, step-down facilities for youth in crisis, mobile response and stabilization teams for youth in crisis, treatment foster care homes, day treatment services, intensive outpatient and partial hospitalization services. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -